Oklahoma, session 2025, SB225.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1-451 of Title 63, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. The Oklahoma Rare Disease Advisory Council shall be


established within the State Department of Health in accordance with


this section.


B. The purpose of the Council shall be to provide guidance and


recommendations to educate the public, the Legislature, and other


state agencies, as appropriate, on the needs of individuals with


rare diseases living in this state.

Req. No. 477 Page 1


C. The Council shall conduct the following activities to


benefit those impacted by rare diseases in this state:


1. Convene public hearings, make inquiries, and solicit


comments from the general public in Oklahoma to assist the Council


with a first-year landscape or survey of the needs of rare disease


patients, caregivers, and providers in the state;


2. Provide testimony and comments on pending legislation and


regulations before the Legislature, if called, and other state


agencies that impact Oklahoma’s rare disease community;


3. Consult with experts on rare diseases to develop policy


recommendations to improve patient access to, and quality of, rare


disease specialists, affordable and comprehensive health care


coverage, relevant diagnostics, timely treatment, and other needed


services;


4. Establish best practices and protocols to include in state


planning related to natural disasters, public health emergencies, or


other emergency declarations to enable continuity of care for rare


disease patients and ensure safeguards against discrimination for


rare disease patients are in place;


5. Identify areas of unmet need for research and opportunities


for collaboration with stakeholders and other states’ rare disease


advisory councils that can inform future studies and work done by


the Council; and



Req. No. 477 Page 2


6. Research and identify best practices to reduce health


disparities and achieve health equity in the research, diagnosis,


and treatment of rare disease in this state.


D. 1. The Council’s appointment process shall be conducted in


a transparent manner to provide interested individuals an


opportunity to apply for membership on the Council. All members of


the Council shall be full-time residents of this state as


practicable. Membership shall include a diverse set of stakeholders


representative of the geographic and population diversity of the


state.


2. The Governor shall appoint the chair of the Council not


later than December 1, 2025. The chair shall not hold any position


within the government of this state.


3. The chair shall appoint no fewer than thirteen (13) members,


including the following:


a. one representative of an academic research institution


in the state that receives any grant funding for rare


disease research,


b. one representative of the Oklahoma Health Care


Authority,


c. one representative of the Insurance Department,


d. one Registered Nurse or Advanced Practice Registered


Nurse licensed and practicing in this state with


experience treating rare diseases,

Req. No. 477 Page 3


e. one physician practicing in this state with experience


treating rare diseases,


f. one hospital administrator, or his or her designee,


from a hospital in this state that provides care to


persons diagnosed with a rare disease,


g. at least two patients who have a rare disease,


h. at least one caregiver of a person with a rare


disease,


i. one representative of a rare disease patient


organization that operates in this state,


j. one representative of the biopharmaceutical industry,


k. one representative of a health plan company, and


l. one member of the scientific community who is engaged


in rare disease research including, but not limited


to, a medical researcher with experience conducting


research on rare diseases.


4. The chair may appoint additional members on an ad hoc basis.


E. 1. The Council shall electronically submit a report to the


President Pro Tempore of the Senate, the Speaker of the House of


Representatives, and the Governor within one (1) year of


establishment of the Oklahoma Rare Disease Advisory Council and


annually thereafter. Prior to submission, a draft of the annual


report shall be made available for public comment and discussed at


an open public meeting.

Req. No. 477 Page 4


2. Annual reports shall:


a. describe the activities and progress of the Council


under this section, and


b. provide recommendations to the Legislature and


Governor on ways to address the needs of people living


with rare diseases in this state.


F. 1. The initial meeting of the Council shall occur no later


than February 1, 2026. Thereafter, the Council shall meet no less


than quarterly.


2. Meetings of the Council shall be conducted in accordance


with the Oklahoma Open Meeting Act.


G. The Council shall:


1. Provide opportunities for the public to hear updates and


provide input into its work; and


2. Create and maintain a public website where meeting minutes,


notices of upcoming meetings, and public comments may be submitted.


H. 1. The Governor shall appoint the chair for an initial term


of three (3) years. At the end of the chair’s initial three-year


term, and every two (2) years thereafter, members of the Council


shall elect, by a majority vote, a new chair.


2. Council members shall serve no longer than three (3) years,


except that, to facilitate a staggered rotation of members to retain


continuity and knowledge transfer, during the initial five (5) years



Req. No. 477 Page 5


after the establishment of the Council, members may serve up to a


four-year term.


3. If a vacancy occurs, the Council, by a majority vote, shall


fill such vacancy in a timely manner and in compliance with


requirements set forth in subsection D of this section.


I. As used in this section, “rare disease”, sometimes called an


orphan disease, means a disease that affects fewer than two hundred


thousand (200,000) people in the United States.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.




60-1-477 DC 12/30/2024 4:53:40 PM



























Req. No. 477 Page 6